src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-guolle_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - guolle: # N_EVEN (CG and VH)
    guolle+N+Sg+Nom: guolle
    guolle+N+Sg+Gen: guole
    guolle+N+Sg+Acc: guolev
    guolle+N+Sg+Ill: guolláj
    guolle+N+Sg+Ine: guolen
    guolle+N+Sg+Ela: [guolest, guoles]
    guolle+N+Sg+Com: [gulijn, gulijna]
    guolle+N+Pl+Nom: guole
    guolle+N+Pl+Gen: gulij
    guolle+N+Pl+Acc: gulijt
    guolle+N+Pl+Ill: gulijda
    guolle+N+Pl+Ine: gulijn
    guolle+N+Pl+Ela: [gulijst, gulijs]
    guolle+N+Pl+Com: [gulij, gulijgum]
    guolle+N+Ess: guollen

    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guolátj
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: guolátja
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: guolátjav
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: guolátjij
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine: guolátjin
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela: [guolátjist, guolátjis]
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: guolátjijn
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: guolátja
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: guolátjij
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: guolátjijt
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: guolátjijda
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine: guolátjijn
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela: [guolátjijst, guolátjijs]
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: [guolátjij, guolátjijgum]
    guolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: guolátjin
 
 
